Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 2

Tennessee Meat and Poultry Inspection Act

53-7-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Meat and Poultry Inspection Act.”

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-915.

Cross-References. Beef promotion board, § 43-29-118.

Pork promotion board, § 43-29-119.

53-7-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adulterated” applies to any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, part of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, meat food product or poultry product under one (1) or more of the following circumstances:

If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render it injurious to health. In cases where the substance is not an added substance, the article shall not be considered adulterated under this subdivision (1) if the quantity of the substance does not ordinarily render it injurious to health;

If it bears or contains any added poisonous or added deleterious substance, unless the substance is permitted in its production or unavoidable under good manufacturing practices as may be determined by rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner; provided, that any quantity of the added substances exceeding the limit so fixed shall also be deemed to constitute adulteration;

If any substance has been substituted, wholly or in part, for the livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, part of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, meat product or poultry product;

If damage or inferiority has been concealed in any manner;

If any valuable constituent has been, in whole or in part, omitted or abstracted from the livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, part of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, meat product or poultry product; or

If any substance has been added, mixed or packed with the livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, part of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, meat product or poultry product, so as to increase its bulk or weight, to reduce its quality or strength, or to make it appear better or of greater value than it is;

“Bait” or “bait and switch” advertising is an alluring or fantastic offer or false and misleading offer that is not a bona fide offer to sell, but that is a means of attracting the prospective customer, the purpose being to sell or switch to some other product;

“Carcass” means all parts, including viscera of a slaughtered animal, that are capable of being used for human food;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture, or any person authorized to act in the commissioner's stead;

“Container” and “package” include any box, can, tin, cloth, plastic, or any other receptacle, wrapper or cover;

“Custom slaughterer” means a person engaged for profit in this state in the business of slaughtering or dressing animals for human consumption that are not to be sold or offered for sale through a commercial outlet, and may include the boning or cutting up of carcasses of such animals and the grinding, chopping and mixing of the carcasses of animals;

“Federal Meat Inspection Act” means the act of congress approved March 4, 1907, as amended and extended, compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 601 et seq., and the imported meat provisions of the Tariff Act of 1930, § 306(b) and (c), as amended (19 U.S.C. § 1306(c) [repealed] and 21 U.S.C. § 620);

“Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act” means the act of congress approved August 28, 1957, as amended, compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 451 et seq.;

“Immediate container” means any consumer package, or any other container in which an article, not consumer packaged, is packed;

“Inspection service” means the official government service within the department of agriculture of this state designated by the commissioner as having the responsibility for carrying out this part;

“Inspector” means an employee or official of this state authorized by the commissioner to inspect the operation and facilities of any custom slaughterhouse or meat or poultry processing establishment;

“Intrastate commerce” means commerce within this state;

“Label” means any written, printed, or graphic material upon the shipping container, if any, or upon the immediate container, including, but not limited to, an individual consumer package, of an article, or accompanying the article;

“Livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats or rabbits;

“Meat” means the edible part of the muscle of cattle, deer, sheep, swine or goats that is skeletal or that is found in the tongue, in the diaphragm, in the heart, or in the esophagus, with or without the accompanying and overlying fat, and the portions of bone, skin, sinew, nerve and blood vessels that normally accompany the muscle tissue and that are not separated from it in the process of dressing. It does not include the muscle found in the lips, snout or ears;

“Meat by-product” means any edible part other than meat that has been derived from one (1) or more cattle, deer, sheep, swine, goats or rabbits;

“Meat food product” means any article of food, or any article intended for or capable of use as human food, that is derived or prepared, in whole or in part, from any portion of any livestock or deer, unless exempted by the commissioner upon the commissioner's determination that the article:

Contains only a minimal amount of meat and is not represented as a meat food product; or

Is for medicinal purposes and is advertised only to the medical profession;

“Official establishment” means any establishment in this state, as determined by the commissioner, at which inspection of the slaughter of livestock or poultry or the processing of livestock, deer, or poultry carcasses or parts of livestock, deer, or poultry carcasses, meat food products, or poultry products, is maintained under the authority of this part;

“Official inspection mark” means any symbol, formulated pursuant to rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner, stating that an article was inspected and passed;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or any other business entity;

“Poultry” means any live or slaughtered domesticated bird;

“Poultry product” means any poultry that has been slaughtered for human food from which the blood, feathers, feet, head and viscera have been removed in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner, any edible part of poultry, or any human food product consisting of any edible part of poultry separately or in combination with other ingredients. However, any human food product may be exempted from this subdivision (22) by the commissioner upon the commissioner's determination that the product:

Contains only a minimal amount of poultry and is not represented as a poultry product; or

Is used for medicinal purposes and is advertised only to the medical profession;

“Processor” means a person who engages for profit in this state in the business of packing or packaging carcasses, meat, meat food products or meat by-products, or poultry or poultry products, for human consumption, or a person engaged for profit in the business of curing, salting, processing or other preparing of carcasses, meat, meat food products or meat by-products for human consumption;

“Shipping container” means any container used or intended for use in packaging the article packed in an immediate container;

“Unwholesome” means:

Unsound, injurious to health, containing any biological residue not permitted by rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner, or otherwise rendered unfit for human food;

Consisting, in whole or in part, of any filthy, putrid or decomposed substance;

Processed, prepared, packed or held under unsanitary conditions whereby any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass or part of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass or any meat food product or poultry product may have become contaminated with filth or may have been rendered injurious to health;

Produced, in whole or in part, from livestock or poultry that is diseased, dead, dying or disabled and that has died otherwise than by slaughter;

Produced, in whole or in part, from deer that is diseased, dying, or disabled and that has died otherwise than by lawful harvest; or

Packaged in a container composed of any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render the contents injurious to health; and

“Wholesome” means sound, healthful, clean and otherwise fit for human food.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-916; Acts 2007, ch. 421, §§ 1-7.

Compiler's Notes. 19 U.S.C. § 1306, referred to in this section, was repealed by P.L. 107-171, Title X, Subtitle E, § 10418(a)(5), 116 Stat. 507, on May 13, 2002.

Acts 2007, ch. 421, § 20 provided that the commissioner of agriculture is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Attorney General Opinions. For purposes of T.C.A. § 53-7-202(6), as long as the owners for whom a custom slaughterer slaughters or processes an animal or animals do not constitute a commercial outlet and do not sell or offer for sale the slaughtered animal through a commercial outlet, there is no limit on the number of owners for whom a custom slaughterer may legally slaughter and process an animal or animals. As long as the owners for whom a custom slaughterer slaughters or processes an animal do not constitute a commercial outlet and do not sell or offer for sale the slaughtered animal through a commercial outlet, the owner of the animal may be a group. Furthermore, T.C.A. § 53-7-209(a)(1) does not require an ownership interest in an animal, merely that it be livestock or poultry of their own raising on their own farms, for their own consumption. The statute likewise does not restrict the number or type of owners or the type or number of partial owners of an animal. OAG 17-11, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (2/17/2017).

53-7-203. Ante mortem and post mortem inspections — Quarantine, seizure, tagging, and destruction or reprocessing — Procedures.

For the purpose of preventing the entry into or movement in intrastate commerce of any livestock or poultry carcass, part of any livestock or poultry carcass, meat food product or poultry product that is unwholesome or adulterated and is intended for or capable of use as human food, the commissioner shall, where and to the extent considered by the commissioner necessary, cause to be made by inspectors ante mortem inspection of livestock and poultry in any official establishment where livestock or poultry are slaughtered for intrastate commerce.

For the purpose stated in subdivision (a)(1), the commissioner, whenever slaughtering or other processing operations are being conducted, shall cause to be made by inspectors post mortem inspection of the carcasses and parts of carcasses of each animal and bird slaughtered in any official establishment, and shall cause to be made by inspectors an inspection of all meat food products and poultry products processed in any official establishment in which meat food products or poultry products are processed for intrastate commerce.

The commissioner shall cause, at any time, quarantine, seizure, segregation, and reinspection of livestock and poultry, livestock and poultry carcasses and parts of livestock or poultry carcasses, meat food products and poultry products in official establishments that the commissioner deems necessary to effectuate the purposes of this part.

Whenever a duly authorized agent of the commissioner finds, or has probable cause to believe, that any livestock or poultry carcasses or part of livestock or poultry carcasses, processed meat food products or poultry products, in an official establishment or in other trade channels where the product is held or offered for sale, is adulterated or misbranded so as to be fraudulent or has been prepared, packed, processed or held under conditions whereby it may have become contaminated within the meaning of this part, the agent shall affix to the article a tag or other appropriate marking, giving notice that the article is, or is suspected of being, adulterated or misbranded and has been detained or quarantined, and warning all persons not to remove or dispose of the article by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by the agent or the court. It is unlawful for any person to remove or dispose of detained or quarantined articles by sale or otherwise without permission.

All livestock and poultry carcasses and parts of livestock or poultry carcasses, meat food products, and poultry products found by an inspector to be unwholesome or adulterated in any official establishment or other trade channels where the product is held or offered for sale, shall be condemned and shall, if no appeal be taken from the determination of condemnation, be destroyed for human food purposes under the supervision of an inspector; provided, that articles that may, by reprocessing, be made not unwholesome and not adulterated need not be so condemned and destroyed if so reprocessed under the supervision of an inspector and thereafter found to be not unwholesome and not adulterated or not misbranded. If any appeal is taken to the commissioner from the determination, the articles shall be appropriately marked and segregated pending completion of an appeal inspection, which appeal shall be at the cost of the appellant if the commissioner determines that the appeal is frivolous or without merit. If the determination of condemnation is sustained, the articles shall be destroyed for human food purposes under the supervision of an inspector.

One (1) inspector may be assigned to two (2) or more establishments where few animals are slaughtered or where small quantities of carcasses, meat or poultry or meat food products and poultry products are processed. When inspector assignments are made, the commissioner shall designate the days and hours when slaughtering and processing will be done.

The licensee shall pay for devices and supplies used for marking and stamping and for carcass and meat containers and labels. The devices and supplies shall be under the control of the inspector.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 3; T.C.A., § 52-917.

53-7-204. Inspection and sanitary standards for official establishments for slaughtering or processing of livestock or poultry.

Each official establishment at which livestock or poultry are slaughtered or livestock, deer, or poultry carcasses or parts of livestock, deer, or poultry carcasses, meat food products, or poultry products are processed for intrastate commerce shall have the premises, facilities and equipment, and be operated in accordance with sanitary practices required by rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner for the purpose of preventing the entry into and movement in commerce of carcasses, parts of carcasses, meat food products, and poultry products that are unwholesome or adulterated.

Nothing in subdivision (a)(1) shall be construed as permitting the sale of deer.

No livestock, deer, or poultry carcasses or parts of livestock, deer, or poultry carcasses, meat food products or poultry products shall be admitted into any official establishment, unless they have been prepared only under inspection pursuant to this part or the federal Meat Inspection Act, compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 601 et seq., or the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act, compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 451 et seq., or their admission is permitted by rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner under this part.

Each establishment licensed under this part that freezes meat or poultry carcasses, parts of meat or poultry carcasses or meat food products or poultry products must be equipped to quick or sharp freeze at ten degrees below zero Fahrenheit (-10° F) and otherwise be equipped to process, store and deliver frozen foods according to official regulations.

The commissioner shall refuse to render inspection to any establishment whose premises, facilities or equipment, or the operation of the premises, facilities or equipment, fail to meet the requirements of this section.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 4; T.C.A., § 52-918; Acts 2007, ch. 421, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 421, § 20 provided that the commissioner of agriculture is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

53-7-205. Official inspection marks and required labeling — Conforming products acceptable for intrastate commerce — False or misleading labels.

Each shipping container of any meat, meat food product, or poultry product inspected under the authority of this part and found to be wholesome and not adulterated, shall, at the time the product leaves the official establishment, bear, in distinctly legible form, the official inspection mark and the approved plant number of the official establishment in which the contents were processed.

Each immediate container of any meat, meat food product or poultry product inspected under the authority of this part and found to be wholesome and not adulterated, shall, at the time the product leaves the official establishment, bear, in addition to the official inspection mark, in distinctly legible form, the name of the product, a statement of ingredients, if fabricated from two (2) or more ingredients, including a declaration as to artificial flavors, colors or preservatives, where the food additives are permitted by this part or regulations, the net weight or other appropriate measure of the contents, the name and address of the processor and the approved plant number of the official establishment in which the contents were processed.

The name and address of the distributor may be used in lieu of the name and address of the processor if the approved plant number is used to identify the official establishment in which the article was prepared and packed.

Each livestock carcass and each primal part of a livestock carcass and meat by-products as hearts and livers shall bear the official inspection mark and approved plant number of the establishment when it leaves the official establishment.

The commissioner may by rules and regulations require additional marks or label information to appear on livestock or poultry carcasses or parts of livestock or poultry carcasses, meat food products or poultry products when they leave the official establishments or at the time of their transportation or sale in this state, and the commissioner may permit reasonable variations and grant exemptions from the marking and labeling requirements of this subsection (a) in any manner not in conflict with the purposes of this part.

Marks and labels required under this subsection (a) shall be applied only by, or under the supervision of, an inspector.

Properly marked and labeled meat food products, poultry food products and carcasses or parts of livestock and poultry shall be acceptable for intrastate movement, and the products shall be acceptable for both public and institutional purchase.

The use of any written, printed or graphic matter upon or accompanying any livestock or poultry carcass, or parts of livestock or poultry carcasses, meat food product, or poultry product inspected or required to be inspected pursuant to this part or the container of the livestock or poultry carcass, or parts of the livestock or poultry carcass, meat food products, or poultry products, that is false or misleading in any particular is prohibited.

No livestock or poultry carcasses or parts of livestock or poultry carcasses, meat food products, or poultry products inspected or required to be inspected pursuant to this part shall be sold or offered for sale by any person, firm or corporation under any false or deceptive name. Established trade names that are usual to the articles and that are not false or deceptive and that are approved by the commissioner are permitted.

If the commissioner has reason to believe that any label in use or prepared for use is false or misleading in any particular, the commissioner may direct that the use of the label be withheld, unless it is modified in a manner the commissioner may prescribe so that it is not false or misleading.

If the person using or proposing to use the label does not accept the determination of the commissioner, the person may request a hearing, but the use of the label shall, if the commissioner so directs, be withheld pending hearing and final determination by the commissioner.

The determination by the commissioner shall be conclusive unless, within thirty (30) days after the receipt of notice of the final determination, the person adversely affected by the determination appeals the decision of the commissioner to the circuit court pursuant to the provisions for appeals provided in § 53-7-217.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 5; T.C.A., § 52-919.

53-7-206. Prohibited acts.

The following acts or the causing of the following acts within this state is prohibited:

The processing for, or the sale or offering for sale, transportation, or delivery or receiving for transportation, in intrastate commerce, of any livestock carcass or part of any livestock carcass, meat food product, or poultry product, unless the article has been inspected for wholesomeness, and unless the article and its shipping container and immediate container, if any, are marked in accordance with the requirements under this part or the federal Meat Inspection Act, compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 601 et seq., or the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act, compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 451 et seq.;

The sale or other disposition for human food of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass or part of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, meat food product, or poultry product that has been inspected and declared to be unwholesome or adulterated under this part;

Falsely making or issuing, altering, forging, simulating, or counterfeiting, or using without proper authority any official inspection certificate, memorandum, mark, or other identification, or device for making the mark or identification, used in connection with inspection under this part, or causing, procuring, aiding, assisting in, or being a party to, the false making, issuing, altering, forging, simulating, counterfeiting, or unauthorized use, or knowingly processing, without promptly notifying the commissioner or the commissioner's representative, uttering, publishing, or using as true, or causing to be uttered, published, or used as true, any falsely made or issued, altered, forged, simulated, or counterfeited official inspection certificate, memorandum, mark, or other identification, or device for making the mark or identification, or representing that any article has been officially inspected under the authority of this part when the article has in fact not been so inspected, or knowingly making any false representation in any certificate prescribed by the commissioner in rules or regulations under this part or any form resembling the certificate;

Using in intrastate commerce a false or misleading label on any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass or part of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, meat food product, or poultry product;

Engaging in or abetting another in bait and switch tactics in promoting for sale and selling livestock and poultry carcasses or parts of any livestock or poultry carcass, or meat products or poultry products and using false or misleading advertisements or for any advertising medium to knowingly publish false or misleading advertising;

Using any container bearing an official inspection mark, except for the article in the original form in which it was inspected and covered by the mark, unless the mark is removed, obliterated or otherwise destroyed;

Refusing to permit access by any duly authorized representative of the commissioner, at all reasonable times, to the premises of an establishment in this state at which livestock or poultry are slaughtered or livestock, deer, or poultry carcasses or parts of livestock, deer, or poultry carcasses, meat, meat food products, or poultry products are processed for intrastate commerce, upon presentation of appropriate credentials;

Refusing to permit access to and the copying of any record as authorized by § 53-7-208;

Using by any person to the person's own advantage, or revealing, other than to the authorized representatives of any government agency in their official capacity, or to the courts when relevant in any judicial proceeding, any information acquired under the authority of this part, concerning any matter that is entitled to protection as a trade secret;

Holding, delivering, receiving, transporting, selling, or offering for sale or transportation in intrastate commerce, for human consumption, any uneviscerated slaughtered poultry, or any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass or part of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, meat food product or poultry product that has been processed in violation of any requirements under this part, except as may be authorized by and pursuant to rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner;

Holding, delivering, receiving, transporting, selling, or offering for sale or transportation in intrastate commerce any livestock or poultry carcass or part of any livestock or poultry carcass, meat food product, or poultry product exempted under § 53-7-209 that is unwholesome or adulterated, and is intended for human consumption;

Applying to any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass or part of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, meat food product, or poultry product, or any container of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass or any part of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcass, meat food product or poultry product, any official inspection mark or label required under this part, except by, or under the supervision of, an inspector;

Refusing to make application for a license and refusing to pay, or operating a plant without payment of all license and inspection fees;

Removing or selling any article detained or embargoed by an inspector;

Violating any rule or regulation as authorized by this part;

Disposing of or selling any dead, dying, diseased or disabled animals or poultry or carcasses or parts of any carcasses, except in a manner as prescribed by regulations of the commissioner; and

The continued operation of any custom or commercial slaughterhouse or meat or poultry processing establishment that is in an unsanitary condition or that fails to comply with the specifications and standards that have been established by regulation by the commissioner.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 6; 1969, ch. 108, § 1; 1974, ch. 626, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-920; Acts 2007, ch. 421, §§ 9-13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 421, § 20 provided that the commissioner of agriculture is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Deceptive business practices, § 39-14-127.

“Federal Meat Inspection Act” defined, § 53-7-202.

“Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act” defined, § 53-7-202.

Penalty for violation of section, § 53-7-210.

53-7-207. Compliance with law required for operation.

Subject to § 53-7-214(a), no establishment in this state shall slaughter any livestock or poultry or process any livestock, deer, or poultry carcasses, or parts of any livestock, deer, or poultry carcasses, meat food products, or poultry products, for human consumption, except in compliance with the requirements of this part.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 7; T.C.A., § 52-921; Acts 2007, ch. 421, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 421, § 20 provided that the commissioner of agriculture is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for violation of section, § 53-7-210.

53-7-208. Records required — Inspection — Retention.

For the purpose of enforcing this part, persons engaged in this state in the business of processing for intrastate commerce or transporting, shipping or receiving in intrastate commerce livestock or poultry slaughtered for human consumption, or meat, meat food products or poultry products, or holding the articles so received, shall maintain records the commissioner, by regulation, may require, showing, to the extent that they are concerned with the receipt, delivery, sale, movement or disposition of such articles, and shall, upon the request of a duly authorized representative of the commissioner, permit the duly authorized representative at reasonable times to have access to and to copy all the records.

Any record required to be maintained by this section shall be maintained for a period of two (2) years after the transaction that is the subject of the record has taken place.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 8; T.C.A., § 52-922.

Cross-References. Penalty for violation of section, § 53-7-210.

53-7-209. Exemptions.

The commissioner shall, by regulation and under conditions as to labeling, and sanitary standards, practices, and procedures that the commissioner may prescribe, exempt from specific provisions of this part:

Livestock producers and poultry producers with respect to livestock and poultry carcasses and parts of livestock and poultry carcasses, meat food products, and poultry products, processed by them from livestock or poultry of their own raising on their own farms, for their own consumption, the excess of which may be sold directly to consumers;

Retail dealers with respect to meat and meat food products sold directly to consumers in individual retail stores; and retail dealers with respect to poultry products sold directly to consumers in individual retail stores, if the only processing operation performed by the retail dealers with respect to poultry is the cutting up of poultry products on the premises where the sales to consumers are made;

Any person engaged in slaughtering livestock or poultry or processing livestock or poultry carcasses or parts of livestock or poultry carcasses, meat food products, or poultry products for intrastate commerce, and the articles so processed by the person, whenever the commissioner determines that it would be impracticable to provide inspection and the exemption will aid in the effective administration of this part;

Persons slaughtering livestock or poultry or otherwise processing or handling livestock or poultry carcasses or parts of livestock or poultry carcasses, meat food products, or poultry products, that have been or are to be processed as required by recognized religious dietary laws, to the extent that the commissioner determines is necessary to avoid conflict with the requirements while still effectuating the purposes of this part;

Poultry producers and growers acting in compliance with exemptions established in the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act (21 U.S.C. § 451 et seq.); and

Livestock producers acting in compliance with exemptions established in the federal Meat Inspection Act. The department of agriculture shall maintain on its website information for livestock producers concerning the federal exemptions for livestock slaughter and processing to provide guidance as to the requirements for each federal exemption and its limitations.

The commissioner may by order suspend or terminate any exemption under this section with respect to any person whenever the commissioner finds that the suspension or termination will aid in effectuating the purposes of this part.

This part shall not apply to or affect the slaughter of swine or cattle or the processing of swine, deer, or cattle by or for individuals for their consumption at custom processing plants.

The department of agriculture shall maintain on the web site of the department information for poultry producers and growers concerning the federal exemptions for poultry slaughter and processing. Such information shall provide guidance as to the requirements for each exemption and the limitations thereto.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 9; 1969, ch. 45, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-923; Acts 2007, ch. 421, § 15; 2014, ch. 523, §§ 1, 2; 2017, ch. 386, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 421, § 20 provided that the commissioner of agriculture is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added (a)(5) and (d).

The 2017 amendment added (a)(6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 523, § 3. March 12, 2014.

Acts 2017, ch. 386, § 2. May 18, 2017.

Cross-References. Information for poultry producers and growers concerning federal exemptions on department website, § 4-3-206.

Penalty for violation of section, § 53-7-210.

Attorney General Opinions. For purposes of T.C.A. § 53-7-202(6), as long as the owners for whom a custom slaughterer slaughters or processes an animal or animals do not constitute a commercial outlet and do not sell or offer for sale the slaughtered animal through a commercial outlet, there is no limit on the number of owners for whom a custom slaughterer may legally slaughter and process an animal or animals. As long as the owners for whom a custom slaughterer slaughters or processes an animal do not constitute a commercial outlet and do not sell or offer for sale the slaughtered animal through a commercial outlet, the owner of the animal may be a group. Furthermore, T.C.A. § 53-7-209(a)(1) does not require an ownership interest in an animal, merely that it be livestock or poultry of their own raising on their own farms, for their own consumption. The statute likewise does not restrict the number or type of owners or the type or number of partial owners of an animal. OAG 17-11, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (2/17/2017).

53-7-210. Violations — Injunctive action.

Any violation of §§ 53-7-206 — 53-7-209, or of the rules and regulations duly promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this part is a Class C misdemeanor; provided, that no carrier or warehouseman shall be subject to the penalties of this part, other than the penalties for violation of § 53-7-208, by reason of the receipt, carriage, holding, or delivery, in the usual course of business, as a carrier or warehouseman, of livestock or poultry carcasses, parts of livestock or poultry carcasses, meat food products, or poultry products, owned by another person, unless the carrier or warehouseman has knowledge, or is in possession of facts that would cause a reasonable person to believe that the articles were not inspected or marked in accordance with this part or were not otherwise in compliance with this part.

In addition to the remedies provided in this part, the commissioner, or the commissioner's designated representative, may file for an injunction in the county in which an offense occurred, or in which the offender has the offender's principal place of business or is doing business, or resides, and if the chancellor concludes that the offender has been guilty of violating this part, then the chancellor may enjoin the offender, or owner, or manager, or other person in charge, from slaughtering, processing, handling, transporting or any other activity done in conjunction with meat or poultry for a period of not less than ten (10) days and until such time as the offender comes into compliance with this part. The injunction commences on the day following the date when the judgment becomes final.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 10; 1969, ch. 108, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-924; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

53-7-211. Violators entitled to notice and hearing preceding reports of violations to district attorney general — Alternatives to criminal prosecution.

Before any violation of this part is reported by the commissioner to the district attorney general for institution of a criminal proceeding, the person against whom the proceeding is contemplated shall be given reasonable notice of the alleged violation and opportunity to present the person's views orally or in writing with regard to the contemplated proceeding.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as requiring the commissioner to report for criminal prosecution violations of this part if the commissioner believes that the public interest will be adequately served and compliance with this part obtained by a suitable written notice or warning.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 11; T.C.A., § 52-925.

53-7-212. Cease and desist orders.

Whenever it is brought to the attention of the commissioner that any person operating an establishment continues to willfully operate in violation of this part and after written notice of the violations has been given, the commissioner may issue a cease and desist order against the establishment.

The cease and desist order issued under subsection (a) shall set forth the reasons for its issuance, and shall be personally delivered to the person or the person's agents or sent by registered mail to the address of the establishment.

If the person continues to ignore the cease and desist order, the commissioner is authorized to withdraw or deny inspection for such length of time as is necessary to effectuate compliance with this part.

Any court review that might be desired of action taken by the commissioner shall be reviewed exclusively as provided for in § 53-7-217.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 12; T.C.A., § 52-926.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

53-7-213. Commissioner to promulgate rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations that in the commissioner's judgment will implement and help effectuate the purposes of this part.

By rules and regulations, the commissioner is authorized to establish standards for meat and poultry and for meat food products and poultry products, and to prescribe labeling and advertising standards and requirements.

Subdivision (b)(1) is not intended in any way to limit the commissioner's authority to prescribe other rules and regulations pursuant to this part.

The rules and regulations shall be promulgated pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

In promulgating rules and regulations pursuant to this part, the commissioner may consider rules and regulations that have been promulgated pursuant to the federal Meat Inspection Act, compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 601 et seq., or the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act, compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 451 et seq.

Acts 1967, ch. 99, § 13; modified; T.C.A., § 52-927; Acts 1992, ch. 862, § 1; 2007, ch. 421, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 421, § 20 provided that the commissioner of agriculture is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. “Apparently wholesome deer meat” defined, § 53-13-101.

“Federal Meat Inspection Act” defined, § 53-7-202.

“Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act” defined, § 53-7-202.